Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-420
Selling or offering for sale certain compounds; use; knowledge of seller; unlawful.

No person shall knowingly sell or offer for sale, deliver or give to any person any compound, liquid or chemical or any other substance which will induce an intoxicated condition as defined in section 28-419, when the seller, offerer or deliverer knows or has reason to know that such compound is intended for use to induce such condition.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 80.